Maryland, session 2025, SB0897.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 22. STUDENT TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA RESOURCE GUIDE.
7–2201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0897*

SENATE BILL 897
(B) “CENTER” MEANS THE NATIONAL CENTER FOR SCHOOL MENTAL
HEALTH AT THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND SCHOOL OF MEDICINE.
(C) “GUIDE” MEANS THE STUDENT TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA
RESOURCE GUIDE.
7–2202.
(A) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THE NATIONAL
CENTER FOR SCHOOL MENTAL HEALTH AT THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND
SCHOOL OF MEDICINE, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL
DEVELOP AND PUBLISH A STUDENT TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA RESOURCE
GUIDE THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
AND § 7–2203 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) FOR THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THE GUIDE SHALL COVER
COMMONLY USED TECHNOLOGY PRODUCTS FOR PERSONAL USE BY CHILDREN.
(3) FOR THE 2028–2029 SCHOOL YEAR, THE GUIDE SHALL COVER THE
INFORMATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND COMMONLY USED
TECHNOLOGY PRODUCTS USED IN EDUCATION DELIVERY TO CHILDREN.
(4) FOR THE 2029–2030 SCHOOL YEAR, THE GUIDE SHALL BE
PUBLISHED INTO A MULTIMEDIA PRODUCT COVERING THE INFORMATION UNDER
PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, THE CENTER SHALL COMPLETE A
NEEDS ASSESSMENT TO IDENTIFY:
(1) EXISTING STATE AND FEDERAL RESOURCES TO ASSIST IN
DEVELOPING THE GUIDE;
(2) EXISTING EFFORTS TO EDUCATE FAMILIES ON THE IMPACT OF
TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA ON THE MENTAL HEALTH OF YOUTH IN THE
STATE; AND
(3) GAPS IN THE EXISTING RESOURCES AND EDUCATION EFFORTS.
(C) THE GUIDE DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) AGE–APPROPRIATE INFORMATION AND BEST PRACTICES THAT:

SENATE BILL 897 3
(I) ENCOURAGE STUDENTS AND CAREGIVERS TO UNDERSTAND
HOW TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA CAN BE USED AND MISUSED BY DEVELOPERS
AND USERS; AND
(II) PROMOTE INFORMED DECISION MAKING WHEN USING
TECHNOLOGY, SOCIAL MEDIA, AND THE INTERNET;
(2) INFORMATION AND GUIDANCE ON SAFE INTERNET, TECHNOLOGY,
AND SOCIAL MEDIA USAGE BY STUDENTS IN PREKINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE
12, INCLUDING:
(I) SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS;
(II) ONLINE GAMES;
(III) ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE PRODUCTS;
(IV) NON–ALGORITHM–DRIVEN VIRTUAL COMMUNICATION
PLATFORMS;
(V) E–COMMERCE PLATFORMS;
(VI) SMART PHONES;
(VII) LAPTOPS; AND
(VIII) ANY OTHER PRODUCT, SERVICE, OR DEVICE AN INDIVIDUAL
CAN USE TO COMMUNICATE WITH OTHER INDIVIDUALS THROUGH THE INTERNET;
AND
(3) IF THE CENTER FINDS A GAP IN AVAILABLE INFORMATION
RELATING TO A SPECIFIC CATEGORY OF TECHNOLOGY OR SOCIAL MEDIA, A
REFERENCE TO THE LACK OF AVAILABLE INFORMATION.
(D) THE GUIDE MAY INCLUDE OTHER STATE, FEDERAL, NONPROFIT, OR
PUBLIC RESOURCES.
7–2203.
(A) THE GUIDE DEVELOPED UNDER § 7–2202 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
INCLUDE A SERVICE AND PRODUCT LANDSCAPE REVIEW THAT CONTAINS:
(1) THE NAME OF A SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR SERVICE;

SENATE BILL 897
(2) THE PURPORTED FUNCTION OF THE PRODUCT OR SERVICE;
(3) ANY PRIVACY, SAFETY, OR SECURITY CONCERNS WITH REGARD TO
WHETHER AND HOW DATA IS CAPTURED, STORED, OR SHARED BY THE PRODUCT OR
SERVICE;
(4) WHETHER THE PRODUCT OR SERVICE AFFECTS ADDICTIVE
QUALITIES IN A USER AND, IF SO, HOW;
(5) WAYS IN WHICH A STUDENT IN PREKINDERGARTEN THROUGH
GRADE 12 COULD ACCESS A SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR SERVICE, INCLUDING WHETHER
A SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR SERVICE IS AVAILABLE THROUGH A DEVICE PROVIDED BY
A PUBLIC SCHOOL;
(6) ANY INFORMATION ON THE POTENTIAL HARMFUL IMPACT ON A
USER, INCLUDING EMOTIONAL, PSYCHOLOGICAL, AND PHYSICAL IMPACTS; AND
(7) POSITIVE AND NEGATIVE IMPACT POTENTIAL ON ACADEMIC
GROWTH AND LEARNING.
(B) (1) THE GUIDE SHALL BE WRITTEN IN PLAIN ENGLISH AND CLEARLY
DISPLAY CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE CENTER.
(2) ON REQUEST, THE CENTER SHALL PROVIDE TRANSLATED COPIES
OF THE GUIDE.
7–2204.
FOR THE 2027–2028, 2028–2029, AND 2029–2030 SCHOOL YEARS, ON OR
BEFORE THE FIRST DAY OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR, THE GUIDE SHALL BE:
(1) POSTED ON THE WEBSITES OF THE DEPARTMENT AND EACH
COUNTY BOARD;
(2) UPDATED EACH YEAR BEFORE THE BEGINNING OF THE SCHOOL
YEAR; AND
(3) DISTRIBUTED TO:
(I) EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL; AND

SENATE BILL 897 5
(II) THE PARENT TEACHER ORGANIZATION FOR EACH PUBLIC
SCHOOL.
7–2205.
(A) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION IN THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS TO THE CENTER TO FUND THE
RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT OF THE STUDENT TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIAL MEDIA
RESOURCE GUIDE:
(1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, $100,000; AND
(2) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2028 AND 2029, $125,000.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
CENTER SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS USED TO
CONDUCT RESEARCH ON, DEVELOP, AND UPDATE THE STUDENT TECHNOLOGY AND
SOCIAL MEDIA RESOURCE GUIDE REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.